District of Columbia statutes.
22-3024

Privilege inapplicable for spouses or domestic partners.

Laws attaching a privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses or domestic partners are inapplicable in prosecutions under subchapter II of this chapter where the defendant is or was married to the victim, or is or was a domestic partner of the victim, or where the victim is a child.

History

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 304, 42 DCR 53
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 216(l), 53 DCR 8610

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-4124.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-306 rewrote the section, which had read as follows: “§ 22-3024. Spousal privilege inapplicable. ”Laws attaching a privilege against disclosure of communications between a husband and wife are inapplicable in prosecutions under subchapter II of this chapter where the defendant is or was married to the victim or where the victim is a child.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(l) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(l) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(l) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(l) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).